Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 23. Commercial and Proprietary Information

§79-23-1.
Commercial and financial information exempt from provisions of public access; application of Trade Secrets Act.

Commercial and financial information of a proprietary nature required to be submitted to a public body, as defined by paragraph (a) of Section 25-61-3, by a firm, business, partnership, association, corporation, individual or other like entity, shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983; provided, however, that nothing herein shall be construed to deny access to such information submitted to a regulatory agency by a public utility that is related to the establishment of, or changes in, rates regulated by such agency.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny a public utility the right to protect trade secrets or confidential commercial or financial information, as provided in subsection (1) of Section 25-61-9.

Trade secrets and confidential commercial and financial information of a proprietary nature developed by a college or university under contract with a firm, business, partnership, association, corporation, individual or other like entity shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.

Misappropriation of a trade secret shall be governed by the provisions of Mississippi Uniform Trade Secrets Act, Section 75-26-1 through 75-26-19.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 424, § 22; Laws, 1988, ch. 406, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 442, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983, see §§ 25-61-1 et seq.

Animal rights organization failed to rebut the evidence presented by the university and the company that the data and information requested in the subject records constituted trade secrets and/or confidential commercial and financial information of a proprietary nature developed by the university under contract with the company; therefore, the data and information requested by the organization was exempted from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act, in harmony with applicable federal law, Miss. Code Ann. §§ 25-61-9, through 25-61-13, 79-23-1(3), and 7 U.S.C.S. § 2143(a)(6)(B). Miss. State Univ. v. People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals, Inc., 992 So. 2d 595, 2008 Miss. LEXIS 355 (Miss. 2008).

Publisher was unable to obtain the amount that a utility charged a third party because the information was exempt from disclosure as confidential under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-23-1; the utility had followed the procedures to protect the document under Miss. Code Ann. § 25-61-9(1) and Miss. Pub. Serv. Comm’n R. Prac. & P. 4D, 4I; moreover, the amount charged did not meet the definition of rate under Miss. Code Ann. § 77-3-3(e) because it was a privately negotiated agreement. Gannett River States Publ. Co. v. Entergy Miss., Inc., 940 So. 2d 221, 2006 Miss. LEXIS 447 (Miss. 2006).

Based on Section 79-23-1, the Joint Water Management District may deny access to public records if it finds, consistent with fact, that they constitute commercial or financial information of a proprietary nature required to be submitted by third parties to the District. Griffith, December 6, 1996, A.G. Op. #96-0761.

Records request for lists of names, addresses, phone numbers and other personal identifying data, under the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983 should not be disclosed absent express permission or waiver from the provider of the information. See Section 79-23-1. Griffith, December 6, 1996, A.G. Op. #96-0761.

Bank’s liability, under state law, for disclosing financial information concerning depositor or customer. 81 A.L.R.4th 377.